Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB196.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 211 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The PFAS Working Group is hereby established and shall be attached to the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services for administrative purposes and staff
support.
(2) The PFAS Working Group shall have the following twenty-one (21) members or
their designees:
(a) The commissioner of the Department for Public Health within the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services, who shall serve as chair;
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Environmental Protection within
the Energy and Environment Cabinet;
(c) The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;
(d) The executive director of the Public Service Commission;
(e) The director of the University of Louisville Center for Integrative
Environmental Health Sciences;
(f) The director of the University of Kentucky Superfund Research Center;
(g) The executive director of the Kentucky Conservation Committee;
(h) The executive director of the Kentucky Resources Council;
(i) The president of the Kentucky Association of Manufacturers;
(j) The president of the Kentucky Retail Federation;
(k) Three (3) members of the House of Representatives who shall serve as
nonvoting ex officio members, two (2) of whom shall be chosen by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, and one (1) of whom shall be
chosen by the Minority Floor Leader of the House of Representatives;
(l) Three (3) members of the Senate who shall serve as nonvoting ex officio
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 9/8/2025 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 822
members, two (2) of whom shall be chosen by the President of the Senate,
and one (1) of whom shall be chosen by the Minority Floor Leader of the
Senate; and
(m) The county judges/executive for each of the five (5) counties with the
highest PFAS chemical concentrations in their community public drinking
water treatment plants as documented in the latest version of the Energy
and Environment Cabinet's evaluation of Kentucky community drinking
water for PFAS.
(3) The first meeting of the PFAS Working Group shall be no later than September
1, 2026. The working group shall meet at least three (3) times each year prior to
the annual submission of the report required under subsection (5) of this section.
(4) The PFAS Working Group shall:
(a) Review the latest research on the effect that exposure to PFAS has on
health outcomes amongst individuals within the Commonwealth;
(b) Share state-level data gathered from studies conducted by members of the
working group and others within the Commonwealth;
(c) Consult with any federal, state, or local agencies, nonprofit organizations,
private industry, or other impacted stakeholders on the presence and effect
of PFAS within the Commonwealth; and
(d) Develop recommendations for the mitigation of the effect of PFAS on
health outcomes in the Commonwealth.
(5) The PFAS Working Group shall submit a report to the Governor and to the
Legislative Research Commission on or before December 1, 2026, and each
December 1 thereafter, detailing all working group activity since its previous
report and providing policy recommendations for the mitigation of the effect of
PFAS on health outcomes in the Commonwealth.
(6) As used in this section, "PFAS chemical" or "PFAS" means all perfluoroalkyl
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 9/8/2025 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 822
or polyfluoroalkyl substances containing at least one (1) fully fluorinated carbon
atom.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 10 OF KRS CHAPTER
224 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section and Section 3 of this Act:
(a) "Intentionally added" means PFAS deliberately added during the
manufacture of a product where the continued presence of PFAS is desired
in the final product or one (1) of the product's components to perform a
specific function;
(b) "PFAS" means all perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substances containing
at least one (1) fully fluorinated carbon atom;
(c) "Product component" means an identifiable component of a product,
regardless of whether the manufacturer of the product is the manufacturer
of the component; and
(d) "Wastewater treatment facility" means a facility that is regulated or
established under this chapter or KRS Chapter 76, 96, 220, or 278, that
provides for or engages in the collection, transmission, or treatment of
sewage.
(2) Beginning on January 1, 2027, and every January 1 thereafter, a manufacturer
of a product sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the Commonwealth that
contains intentionally added PFAS shall submit to the secretary, in a form and
manner to be determined by the secretary, information that includes:
(a) A brief description of the product, including a universal product code, stock
keeping unit, or other numeric code assigned to the product;
(b) The purpose for which PFAS are used in the product, including in any
product components containing PFAS;
(c) The amount of PFAS in the product, identified by their chemical abstracts
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 9/8/2025 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 822
service registry numbers, reported as an exact quantity determined using
commercially available analytical methods or as falling within a range
approved for reporting purposes by the secretary;
(d) The name and address of the manufacturer and the name, address, and
phone number of a contact person for the manufacturer; and
(e) Any additional information requested by the secretary necessary to
implement the requirements of this section.
(3) With the approval of the secretary, a manufacturer may supply the information
required by subsection (2) of this section for a category or type of product rather
than for each individual product.
(4) A manufacturer shall submit the information required under this section
whenever a new product that contains intentionally added PFAS is sold, offered
for sale, or distributed in the Commonwealth, and update and revise the
information whenever there is a significant change in the information or when
requested to do so by the secretary.
(5) A person shall not sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in the Commonwealth
a product containing intentionally added PFAS if the manufacturer has failed to
provide the information required under this section.
(6) No later than thirty (30) days after a manufacturer has made a disclosure under
this section, the cabinet shall publish the list of products, the manufacturers of
the products, and the PFAS that the products contain on the cabinet's website.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 10 OF KRS CHAPTER
224 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A manufacturer of a product that is produced in the Commonwealth that
contains intentionally added PFAS shall report to the secretary, in a form and
manner to be determined by the secretary:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2027, and every January 1 thereafter, the amount
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 9/8/2025 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 822
and the names of PFAS that the manufacturer's facility or facilities have
released in the Commonwealth over the course of the previous year; and
(b) As needed for any individual release of PFAS greater than ten (10) pounds
over the course of twenty-four (24) hours. A report made under this
paragraph shall include the amount, location, and name of the PFAS
released.
(2) The cabinet shall publish all PFAS release disclosure reports on its website.
Disclosure reports made under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be published
within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt.
(3) Upon receipt of a PFAS release disclosure report made under subsection (1)(b) of
this section, the secretary shall notify the county judge/executive of the county in
which the entity is located of the amount, location, and name of the PFAS
released, and shall provide a copy of the report to the county judge/executive.
(4) Upon receipt of a PFAS release disclosure report from the secretary, the county
judge/executive shall:
(a) Post a notice of the contents of the report on the county government website
within twenty-four (24) hours;
(b) Post a notice of the contents of the report on all social media pages operated
by the county government within twenty-four (24) hours; and
(c) Inform the members of the county's legislative body of the contents of the
report at the body's next scheduled meeting.
(5) Wastewater treatment facilities shall not refuse to accept or treat sewage due to
the concentration of PFAS found in or reported to be found in the sewage.
(6) On or before January 1, 2027, the cabinet shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A requiring that each wastewater
treatment facility monitor and annually report to the cabinet the PFAS
concentration levels found in sewage after it is treated by the wastewater
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 9/8/2025 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 822
treatment facility.
Section 4. KRS 224.99-030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any applicant or certificate holder who fails to provide the information required in
KRS 224.1-310 or falsifies such information shall be liable for a civil penalty of not
to exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The penalty shall be
recoverable in an action brought in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by
the cabinet, or upon the secretary's request, by the Attorney General.
(2) Any manufacturer or county judge/executive who fails to comply with the
reporting requirements in Section 3 of this Act shall be liable for a civil penalty of
not to exceed the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day until in
compliance. The penalty shall be recoverable in an action brought in the name of
the Commonwealth of Kentucky by the cabinet, or upon the secretary's request,
by the Attorney General.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 9/8/2025 1:47 PM Jacketed